Nevada, session 83, SB478.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Supreme Court of Nevada the sum of $814,720
for the Administrative Office of the Courts budget account for the
costs of upgrading the multicounty integrated justice information
system.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Supreme Court of Nevada the sum of
$1,413,605 for the Administrative Office of the Courts budget
account for the replacement of audiovisual equipment.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Supreme Court of Nevada for the
Administrative Office of the Courts budget account for the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
replacement of computer and other technological equipment
the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $294,400
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $107,040
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 3.5. 1. The State Board of Finance shall issue general
obligation bonds of the State of Nevada in the face amount of not
more than $9,000,000 in the 2025-2027 biennium, the proceeds of
which must be used to acquire the real property described in
subsection 3.
2. The State Land Registrar, on behalf of the Department of
Administration, may negotiate, enter into and execute an agreement
with the owner for the purchase and sale of the real property
described in subsection 3.
3. The real property, with its improvements, that the State Land
Registrar is authorized to acquire pursuant to subsection 2 is
commonly known as the Nevada Supreme Court Building, located
at 408 East Clark Avenue in Las Vegas, Nevada, which is Clark
County Assessor’s Parcel Number 139-34-303-002 and which is
described by the Clark County Assessor, which description may be
further refined through due diligence, as follows:
Lots One (1) through Seven (7), inclusive, in Block
Thirty-Nine (39) of Clark’s Las Vegas Townsite, as shown by
the Map thereof on file in Book 1 Plats, page 37m in the
Office of the County Recorder of Clark County, Nevada,
being a portion of the North Hald (N 1/2) of the Southwest
Quarter (SW 1/4) of Section 34, Township 20 South, Range
61 East, more particularly described as follows:
Commencing at the centerline intersection of Clark
Avenue (80 feet wide) and Fourth Street (80 feet wide);
thence South 62'15'00" East along the centerline of Clark
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Avenue, 40.00 feet; thence South 27'45'00" West, departing
said centerline, 40.00 feet to the intersection of the Easterly
and Southerly Right of Way lines of Fourth Street and Clark
Avenue, said point also being the Point of Beginning; thence
South 62'15'00" East along the Southerly Right of Way line
of Clark Avenue, 140.00 feet; thence South 27'45'00" West
departing said Southerly Right of Way, 175.00 feet; thence
North 62'15'00" West, 140.00 feet to point on the Easterly
Right of Way line of Fourth Street; thence North 27'45'00"
East along said Easterly Right of Way line, 170.00 feet to the
Point of Beginning.
Excepting therefrom that certain spandrel area dedicated
to the City of Las Vegas by document, Book 991206,
Instrument 00228 dated December 6, 1999, Clark.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)